Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-713
Bonds; who may purchase.

Bonds of joint airport authorities are hereby made securities in which all public officers and bodies of this state, all municipal subdivisions and all other political subdivisions of this state, all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are also hereby made securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state, all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, and other political subdivisions of this state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of this state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

Laws 1969, c. 24, § 13, p. 216.